Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB143.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 116.155 is amended to read as follows:
All forms pertaining to registration shall be prescribed and furnished by the State Board
of Elections. The registration form shall include the voter's name; date of birth;
membership in a political party, political organization, or political group as defined in
KRS 118.015, or independent status; Social Security number, if any; mailing and
residence addresses, if different; and such other information as the State Board of
Elections may deem necessary. No person shall be denied the right to register because of
the failure to include his or her Social Security number. All forms which require a voter's
signature shall provide for verification by the signer thereof.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/12/2025 2:21 PM Jacketed